California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) (1) Commencing no later than January 15, 2018, and as needed thereafter, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, subject-matter experts who represent providers, consumer advocates, consumers, family members, counties, and the Legislature, to inform the updates to
 the performance outcomes reports for specialty mental health that the department developed pursuant to Section 14707.5 and the Special Terms and Conditions of the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Services Waiver. The stakeholder consultation shall continuously inform the development of performance outcome and disparities reduction measures.

(2) In building upon the performance outcomes reports for specialty mental health services, the department shall also consider both of the following objectives, among others:

(A) High-quality, culturally and linguistically competent, and accessible specialty mental health services for all eligible beneficiaries, consistent with federal law.

(B) Strategies to reduce mental health disparities.

(3) The performance
 outcomes reports for specialty mental health services shall also consider the Special Terms and Conditions of the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Services Waiver, as approved pursuant to Section 1915(b) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(b)) and the Medicaid Managed Care Quality Rating System.

(4) In order to identify mental health disparities, at a minimum, the performance outcomes reports for specialty mental health services shall be produced using existing data collected by the state, stratified by both the statewide and county levels in the following areas:

 (A) Access, such as timely access to services, including waiting time to assessment and waiting time to first appointment.

(B) Language capacity and language access.

(C) Quality.

(D) Utilization and penetration.

(5) (A) Data required pursuant to paragraph (4) shall be stratified by age, sex, gender identity, race, ethnicity, primary language, sexual orientation, and any other data elements for which there is peer-reviewed evidence to assess performance outcomes related to mental health disparities.

(B) The department shall not report any demographic data under paragraph (4) or this paragraph that would permit identification of individuals.

(6) (A) The department shall publish the performance outcomes reports based on available data for specialty mental health services described in this section on the department’s Internet Web site by December 31, 2018. The
 department shall also provide the performance outcomes reports to the Legislature by December 31, 2018.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the department shall update the performance outcomes reports for specialty mental health and shall post the updated reports on the department’s Internet Web site.

(7) Commencing January 1, 2019, the department shall consult, as needed, with the stakeholders specified in paragraph (1) to do both of the following:

(A) Incorporate additional components into the performance outcomes reports, including, but not limited to, components concerning the reduction of mental health disparities, such as timely access to services, language access, and quality and utilization measures, relating to mental health services obtained through Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(B) Make recommendations for statewide quality improvement and efforts to reduce mental health disparities based on information reported in the performance outcomes reports.

(8) Upon completion of the activities specified in paragraph (7), the department shall consult with stakeholders on an as-needed basis.

(9) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   (AB 470)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14708.

(a) For purposes of federal reimbursement to counties that have certified to the state that they have incurred certified public
 expenditures, the reimbursement amounts shall be consistent with federal Medicaid requirements for calculating federal upper payment limits, as specified in the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers.

(b) If the reimbursement methodology utilizes federal upper payment limits and the total cost of services exceeds the state maximum rates in effect for the 2011–12 fiscal year, a county may use certified public expenditures to claim the costs of services that exceed the state maximum rates, up to the federal upper payment limits. If a county chooses to claim costs that exceed the state maximum rates with certified public expenditures, the county shall use only local funds, and not state funds, to claim the portion of the costs over the state maximum rates. As a condition of receiving reimbursement up to the federal upper payment limits, a
 county shall enter into and maintain an agreement with the department implementing this subdivision.

(c) Notwithstanding this section, in the event that a health facility has entered into a negotiated rate agreement pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) of Chapter 7 of Part 4 of Division 9, the facility’s rates shall be governed by that agreement.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5720 (as added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 651, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 155.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14709.

The provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 14000 shall not be construed to prevent providers of specialty mental health services pursuant to this chapter from also being providers of medical assistance mental health services for the purposes of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).
 Clinics providing
 Medi-Cal specialty mental health services pursuant to this
 chapter shall be required to be certified as a condition to reimbursement for providing those medical assistance mental health services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5723 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 158.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14710.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, in determining the amounts which may be paid, fees paid by persons receiving services or fees paid on behalf of persons receiving services by the federal government, by the Medi-Cal program set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000),
 and by other public or private sources, shall be deducted from the costs of providing services. However, a mental health plan may negotiate a contract that permits a specialty mental health care provider to retain unanticipated funds above the budgeted contract amount, provided that the unanticipated revenues are utilized for the specialty mental health services specified in the contract. If a provider is
 permitted by contract to retain unanticipated revenues above the budgeted amount, the specialty mental health provider shall specify the services funded by those revenues in the
 yearend cost report submitted to the mental health plan. A mental health plan shall not permit the retention of any fees paid by private resources on behalf of Medi-Cal beneficiaries without having those fees deducted from the costs of providing services. Whenever feasible, persons with mental illness who are eligible for
 specialty mental health services under the Medi-Cal program shall be treated in a facility approved for reimbursement in that program. General unrestricted or undesignated private charitable donations and contributions made to charitable or nonprofit organizations shall not be considered as “fees paid by persons” or “fees paid on behalf of persons receiving services” under this section and the contributions shall not be applied in determining the amounts to be paid. These unrestricted contributions shall not be used in part or in whole to defray the costs or the allocated costs of the
 Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5721 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 156.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14711.

(a) The department shall develop, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, a reimbursement methodology for use in the Medi-Cal claims processing and interim payment system that maximizes federal funding and utilizes, as much as practicable, federal Medicaid and Medicare reimbursement principles. The department shall work with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in the development of the methodology required by this section.

(b) Reimbursement amounts developed through the methodology required by this section shall be consistent with federal Medicaid requirements and the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers.

(c) Administrative costs shall be claimed separately in a manner consistent with federal Medicaid requirements and the approved Medicaid state plan and waivers and shall be limited to 15 percent of the total actual cost of direct client services.

(d) The cost of performing quality assurance and utilization review activities shall be reimbursed separately and shall not be included in administrative cost.

(e) The reimbursement methodology established pursuant to this section shall be based upon certified public expenditures, which encourage economy and efficiency in service delivery.

(f) The reimbursement amounts established for direct client services pursuant to this section shall be based on increments of time for all noninpatient services.

(g) The reimbursement methodology shall not be implemented until it has received any necessary federal approvals.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 57.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14712.

(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, the department shall implement managed mental health care for Medi-Cal beneficiaries through contracts with mental health plans. Mental health plans may include individual counties, counties acting jointly, or an organization or nongovernmental entity determined by the department to meet mental health plan standards. A contract may be exclusive and may be awarded on a geographic basis.

(b) Two or more counties acting jointly may agree to deliver or subcontract for the delivery of specialty mental health services subject to the approval by the department. The agreement may encompass all or any portion of the specialty mental health services provided
 pursuant to this chapter. This agreement shall not relieve the individual counties of fiscal responsibility for providing these services. Any agreement between counties shall delineate each county’s responsibilities and fiscal liability for overpayments.

(c) (1) The department shall contract with a county or counties acting jointly for the delivery of specialty mental health services to each county’s eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary population. If a county decides not to contract with the department, does not renew its contract, or is unable to meet the standards set by the department, the county shall inform the department of this decision in writing.

(2) If the county is unwilling to contract for the delivery of specialty mental health services, the department shall
 ensure that specialty mental health services are provided to Medi-Cal
 beneficiaries.

(3) If the department or county determines that the county is unable to adequately provide specialty mental health services, or that the county does not meet the standards of a mental health plan, the department shall ensure that specialty mental health services are provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(4) The department may contract with qualifying individual counties, counties acting jointly, or other qualified entities approved by the department for the delivery of specialty mental health services in any county that is unable or unwilling to contract with the department. The county may not subsequently contract to provide specialty mental health services under this chapter unless the department elects to contract with the county.

(d) If a county does not contract with the department or other
 department-approved entity to provide specialty mental health services, the department shall work with the Department of Finance and the Controller to sequester funds from the county that is unable or unwilling to contract in accordance with Section 30027.10 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14713.

(a) The department and mental health plans shall comply with all applicable federal laws, regulations, and the guidelines, standards, and requirements specified in the state plan, waiver, and mental health plan contract, and, except as provided in this chapter, all applicable state statutes and regulations.

(b) If the department determines that a mental health plan has failed to comply with the requirements of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 14600), or this chapter, the department may impose sanctions and plans of correction pursuant to Section
 14197.7.

(c) If federal requirements that affect this chapter are changed, it is the intent of the Legislature that state requirements be revised to comply with those changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 12.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14714.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, a contract entered into pursuant to this chapter shall include a provision that the mental health plan contractor shall bear the financial risk for the cost of providing medically necessary specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) If the mental health plan is not administered by a county, the mental health plan shall not transfer the obligation for any specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries to the county. The mental health plan may purchase services from the county. The mental health plan shall establish mutually agreed-upon protocols with the county that clearly establish conditions
 under which beneficiaries may obtain non-Medi-Cal reimbursable services from the county. Additionally, the plan shall establish mutually agreed-upon protocols with the county for the conditions of transfer of beneficiaries who have lost Medi-Cal eligibility to the county for care under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600), Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of Division 5.

(3) The mental health plan shall be financially responsible for ensuring access and a minimum required scope of benefits and services, consistent with state and federal requirements, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are residents of that county regardless of where the beneficiary resides, except as provided for in Section 14717.1 or 14717.2. The department shall require that the same definition of medical necessity be used, and the
 minimum scope of benefits offered by each mental health plan be the same, except to the extent that prior federal approval is received and is consistent with state and federal laws.

(b) (1) Any contract entered into pursuant to this chapter may be renewed if the mental health plan continues to meet the requirements of this chapter, regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and the terms and conditions of the contract. Failure to meet these requirements shall be cause for nonrenewal of the contract. The department may base the decision to renew on timely completion of a mutually agreed-upon plan of correction of any deficiencies, submissions of required information in a timely manner, or other conditions of the contract.

(2) If the contract is not
 renewed based on the reasons specified in paragraph (1), the department shall notify the Department of Finance, the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, and the Controller of the amounts to be sequestered from the Mental Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Equity Account, and the Vehicle License Fee Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund and the Mental Health Account and the Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, and the Controller shall sequester those funds in the Behavioral Health Subaccount pursuant to Section 30027.10 of the Government Code. Upon this sequestration, the department shall use the funds in accordance with Section 30027.10 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) The obligations of the mental health plan shall be changed only by contract or contract amendment.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the mental health plan shall comply with federal and state requirements, including the applicable sections of the state plan and waiver.

(3) A change may be made during a contract term or at the time of contract renewal, when there is a change in obligations required by federal or state law, or when required by a change in the interpretation or implementation of any law or regulation.

(4) To the extent permitted by federal law, either the department or the mental health plan may request that contract negotiations be reopened during the course of a contract due to substantial changes in the cost of covered benefits that result from an unanticipated event.

(d) The department shall immediately terminate a contract when the director finds that there is an immediate threat to the health and safety of Medi-Cal beneficiaries. Termination of the contract for other reasons shall be subject to reasonable notice of the department’s intent to take that action and notification to affected beneficiaries. The plan may request a hearing by the Office of Administrative Hearings and Appeals.

(e) A mental health plan may terminate its contract in accordance with the contract. The mental health plan shall provide written notice to the department at least 180 days before the termination or nonrenewal of the contract.

(f) Upon the request of the director, the Director of the Department of
 Managed Health Care may exempt a mental health plan from the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code). These exemptions may be subject to conditions the director deems appropriate. This section does not impair or diminish the authority of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, nor does it reduce or otherwise limit the obligation of a mental health plan contractor licensed as a health care service plan to comply with the requirements of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, and the rules of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care promulgated under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975. The director, in consultation with the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, shall analyze
 the
 appropriateness of licensure or application of applicable standards of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975.

(g) The department shall provide oversight to the mental health plans to ensure quality, access, cost efficiency, and compliance with data and reporting requirements. At a minimum, the department shall monitor, through a method independent of any agency of the mental health plan contractor, the level and quality of services provided, expenditures pursuant to the contract, and conformity with federal and state law.

(h) County employees implementing or administering a mental health plan act in a discretionary capacity when they determine whether or not to admit a person for care or to provide any level of care pursuant to this chapter.

(i) If a county discontinues operations as the mental health plan, the department shall approve any new mental health plan. The new mental health plan shall give reasonable consideration to affiliation with nonprofit community mental health agencies that were under contract with the county and that meet the mental health plan’s quality and cost efficiency standards.

(j) This chapter does not modify, alter, or increase the obligations of counties as otherwise limited and defined in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5700) of Part 2 of Division 5. The county’s maximum obligation for services to persons ineligible for Medi-Cal shall be no more than the amount of funds remaining in the mental health subaccount pursuant to Sections 17600, 17601, 17604, 17605, and 17609 after fulfilling
 the Medi-Cal contract
 obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14715.

(a) (1) The department shall require any mental health plan that provides Medi-Cal specialty mental health services to enter into a memorandum of understanding with any Medi-Cal managed care plan that provides Medi-Cal health services to some of the same Medi-Cal recipients served by the mental health plan. The memorandum of understanding shall comply with applicable regulations.

(2) For purposes of this section, a “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any prepaid health plan or Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8
 (commencing with Section 14200), or Part 4 (commencing with Section 101525) of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The department shall require the memorandum of understanding to include both of the following:

(1) A process or entity to be designated by the local mental health plan to receive notice of actions, denials, or deferrals from the Medi-Cal managed care plan, and to provide any additional information requested in the deferral notice as necessary for a medical necessity determination.

(2) A requirement that the local mental health plan respond by the close of the business day following the day the deferral notice is received.

(c) This
 section shall apply to any contracts entered into, amended, modified, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 13.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14716.

(a) Each local mental health plan shall establish a procedure to ensure access to outpatient specialty mental health services, as required by the Early Periodic Screening and Diagnostic Treatment program standards, for any child in foster care who has been placed outside his or her county of adjudication.

(b) The procedure required by subdivision (a) may be established through one or more of the following:

(1) The establishment of, and federal approval, if required, of, a statewide system or procedure.

(2) An arrangement between local mental health plans for reimbursement for services provided by a mental health plan other than the mental health plan in the county of adjudication and designation of an entity to provide additional information needed for approval or reimbursement. This arrangement shall not require providers who are already credentialed or certified by the mental health plan in the beneficiary’s county of residence to be credentialed or certified by, or to contract with, the mental health plan in the county of adjudication.

(3) Arrangements between the mental health plan in the county of adjudication and mental health providers in the beneficiary’s county of residence for authorization of, and reimbursement
 for, services. This arrangement shall not require providers credentialed or certified by, and in good standing with, the mental health plan in the beneficiary’s county of residence to be credentialed or certified by the mental health plan in the county of adjudication.

(c) The department shall collect and keep statistics that will enable the department to compare access to outpatient specialty mental health services by foster children placed in their county of adjudication with access to outpatient specialty mental health services by foster children placed outside of their county of adjudication.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5777.6 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 177.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14717.

(a) In order to facilitate the receipt of medically necessary specialty mental health services by a foster child who is placed outside his or her county of original jurisdiction, the department shall take all of the following actions:

(1) On or before July 1, 2008, create all of the following items, in consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the California Institute for Mental Health, the Child and Family Policy Institute of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the California Alliance of Child and Family Services:

(A) A standardized contract for the purchase of medically necessary specialty
 mental health services from organizational providers when a contract is required.

(B) A standardized specialty mental health service authorization procedure.

(C) A standardized set of documentation standards and forms, including, but not limited to, forms for treatment plans, annual treatment plan updates, day treatment intensive and day treatment rehabilitative progress notes, and treatment authorization requests.

(2) On or before January 1, 2009, use the standardized items as described in paragraph (1) to provide medically necessary specialty mental health services to a foster child who is placed outside his or her county of original jurisdiction, so that organizational providers who are already certified by a mental health plan are not required to be additionally certified by the mental health plan in the county
 of original jurisdiction.

(3) (A) On or before January 1, 2009, use the standardized items described in paragraph (1) to provide medically necessary specialty mental health services to a foster child placed outside his or her county of original jurisdiction to constitute a complete contract, authorization procedure, and set of documentation standards and forms, so that no additional documents are required.

(B) Authorize a county mental health plan to be exempt from subparagraph (A) and have an addendum to a contract, authorization procedure, or set of documentation standards and forms, if the county mental health plan has an externally placed requirement, such as a requirement from a federal integrity agreement, that would affect one of these documents.

(4) Following consultation with
 stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the California Institute for Mental Health, the Child and Family Policy Institute of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the California State Association of Counties, and the California Alliance of Child and Family Services, require the use of the standardized contracts, authorization procedures, and documentation standards and forms as specified in paragraph (1) in the 2008–09 state-county mental health plan contract and each state-county mental health plan contract thereafter.

(5) The mental health plan shall complete a standardized contract, as provided in paragraph (1), if a contract is required, or another mechanism of payment if a contract is not required, with a provider or providers of the county’s choice, to deliver approved specialty mental health services for a specified foster child, within 30 days of an approved treatment authorization
 request.

(b) The California Health and Human Services Agency shall coordinate the efforts of the department and the State Department of Social Services to do all of the following:

(1) Participate with the stakeholders in the activities described in this section.

(2) During budget hearings in 2008 and 2009, report to the Legislature regarding the implementation of this section and subdivision (c) of Section 14716.

(3) On or before July 1, 2008, establish the following, in consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the California Alliance of Child and Family Services, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California:

(A) Informational materials that explain to foster care providers how to arrange for specialty mental health services on behalf of the beneficiary in their care.

(B) Informational materials that county child welfare agencies can access relevant to the provision of services to children in their care from the out-of-county local mental health plan that is responsible for providing those services, including, but not limited to, receiving a copy of the child’s treatment plan within 60 days after requesting services.

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that foster children who are adopted or placed permanently with relative guardians, and who move to a county outside their original county of residence, can access specialty mental health services in a timely manner. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact this
 section as a temporary means of ensuring access to these services, while the appropriate stakeholders pursue a long-term solution in the form of a change to the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System that will allow these children to receive specialty mental health services through their new county of residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 58.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------

14717.1.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “foster child” or “foster children” means a Medi-Cal eligible child or children younger than 21 years of age who have been placed into foster care by a county child welfare agency or a county probation department.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that foster children who are placed outside of their county of original jurisdiction are able to access specialty mental health services in a timely manner, consistent with their individual strengths and needs and the requirements of federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment (EPSDT) services.

(3) It is the further intent of the Legislature to overcome any
 barriers to care that may result when responsibility for providing or arranging for specialty mental health services to foster children who are placed outside of their county of original jurisdiction is retained by the county of original jurisdiction.

(b) In order to facilitate the receipt of medically necessary specialty mental health services by a foster child who is placed outside of their county of original jurisdiction, the California Health and Human Services Agency shall coordinate with the department and the State Department of Social Services to take all of the following actions on or before July 1, 2017:

(1) The department shall issue policy guidance on the conditions for, and exceptions to, presumptive transfer, as described in subdivisions (c) and (d), in consultation with the State Department of Social Services and with the input of stakeholders that include the
 County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, provider representatives, and family and youth advocates.

(2) Policy guidance concerning the conditions for, and exceptions to, presumptive transfer shall ensure all of the following:

(A) The transfer of responsibility improves access to specialty mental health care services consistent with the mental health needs of the foster child.

(B) Presumptive transfer does not disrupt the continuity of care.

(C) Conditions and exceptions are applied consistently statewide, giving due consideration to the varying capabilities of small, medium, and large counties.

(D) Presumptive transfer can be waived only with an individualized determination that an exception applies.

(E) A party to the case who disagrees with the presumptive transfer individualized exception determination made by the county placing agency pursuant to subdivision (d) is afforded an opportunity to request judicial review before a transfer or exception being finalized.

(F) There is a procedure for expedited transfer within 48 hours of placement of the child outside of the county of original jurisdiction.

(c) For purposes of this section, “presumptive transfer” means that absent any exceptions as established pursuant to this section, responsibility for providing or arranging for specialty mental health services shall promptly transfer from the county
 of original jurisdiction to the county in which the foster child resides, under either of the following conditions:

(1) A foster child is placed in a county other than the county of original jurisdiction on or after July 1, 2017.

(2) A foster child who resides in a county other than the county of original jurisdiction after June 30, 2017, and is not receiving specialty mental health services consistent with their mental health needs, requests transfer of responsibility. A foster child who resided in a county other than the county of original jurisdiction after June 30, 2017, and who continues to reside outside the county of original jurisdiction after December 31, 2017, shall have jurisdiction transferred no later than the child’s first regularly scheduled status review hearing conducted pursuant to Section 366 in the 2018 calendar year unless an exception described under
 subdivision (d) applies.

(d) (1) On a case-by-case basis, and when consistent with the medical rights of children in foster care, presumptive transfer may be waived and the responsibility for the provision of specialty mental health services shall remain with the county of original jurisdiction if any of the exceptions described in paragraph (5) exist.

(2) A request for waiver in a manner established by the department may be made by the foster child, the person or agency that is responsible for making mental health care decisions on behalf of the foster child, the county probation agency or the child welfare services agency with responsibility for the care and placement of the child, or any other interested party who owes a legal duty to the child involving the child’s health or welfare, as defined by the department.

(3) The county probation agency or the child welfare services agency with responsibility for the care and placement of the child, in consultation with the child and their parent, the child and family team, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, if one exists, and other professionals who serve the child as appropriate, is responsible for determining whether waiver of the presumptive transfer is appropriate pursuant to the conditions and exceptions established under this section. The person who requested the exception, along with any other parties to the case, shall receive notice of the county agency’s determination.

(4) The individual who requested the exception or any other party to the case who disagrees with the determination made by the county agency pursuant to paragraph (3) may request judicial review before the county’s determination becoming final. The
 court may set the matter for hearing and may confirm or deny the transfer of jurisdiction or application of an exception based on the best interest of the child.

(5) Presumptive transfer may be waived under any of the following exceptions:

(A) It is determined that the transfer would disrupt continuity of care or delay access to services provided to the foster child.

(B) It is determined that the transfer would interfere with family reunification efforts documented in the individual case plan.

(C) The foster child’s placement in a county other than the county of original jurisdiction is expected to last less than six months.

(D) The foster child’s residence is within 30 minutes of travel
 time to the child’s established specialty mental health care provider in the county of original jurisdiction.

(6) A waiver processed based on an exception to presumptive transfer shall be contingent upon the mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction demonstrating an existing contract with a specialty mental health care provider, or the ability to enter into a contract, single case agreement, or other service payment mechanism within 30 days of the waiver decision, and the ability to deliver timely specialty mental health services directly to the foster child. That information shall be documented in the child’s case plan.

(7) A request for waiver, the exceptions claimed as the basis for the request, a determination whether a waiver is determined to be appropriate under this section, and any objections to the determination shall be documented in the foster child’s
 case plan pursuant to Section 16501.1.

(e) If the mental health plan in the county of original jurisdiction has completed an assessment of needed services for the foster child, the mental health plan in the county in which the foster child resides shall accept that assessment. The mental health plan in the county in which the foster child resides may conduct additional assessments if the foster child’s needs change or an updated assessment is needed to determine the child’s needs and identify the needed treatment and services to address those needs.

(f) (1) Upon presumptive transfer, the mental health plan in the county in which the foster child resides shall assume responsibility for the authorization and provision of specialty mental health services and payments for services. The foster child transferred to the mental health plan in the county in which the
 foster child resides shall be considered part of the county of residence caseload for claiming purposes from the Behavioral Health Subaccount and the Behavioral Health Services Growth Special Account, both created pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code.

(2) To support service delivery, continuity of care, and timely payment, the placing agency shall provide notification to the mental health plan that will be responsible for arranging and providing specialty mental health services for the foster child before placing a foster child out of county. The placing agency may complete these notifications through email. If notification before placement is not possible, the placing agency shall notify the appropriate mental health plan no later than three business days after making the out-of-county placement.

(g) The State Department of Social Services and the department shall